Illinois, session 104th, HB5613.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Open Meetings Act is amended by changing 5Section 1.02 as follows: 6    (5 ILCS 120/1.02)  (from Ch. 102, par. 41.02)7    Sec. 1.02. For the purposes of this Act: 8    "Meeting" means any gathering, whether in person or by 9video or audio conference, telephone call, electronic means 10(such as, without limitation, electronic mail, electronic 11chat, and instant messaging), or other means of 12contemporaneous interactive communication, of a majority of a 13quorum of the members of a public body held for the purpose of 14discussing public business or, for a 5-member public body, a 15quorum of the members of a public body held for the purpose of 16discussing public business.17    Accordingly, for a 5-member public body, 3 members of the 18body constitute a quorum and the affirmative vote of 3 members 19is necessary to adopt any motion, resolution, or ordinance, 20unless a greater number is otherwise required. 21    "Public body" includes all legislative, executive, 22administrative or advisory bodies of the State, counties, 23townships, cities, villages, incorporated towns, school   HB5613- 2 -LRB104 20772 BDA 34278 b1districts and all other municipal corporations, boards, 2bureaus, committees or commissions of this State, and any 3subsidiary bodies of any of the foregoing including but not 4limited to committees and subcommittees which are supported in 5whole or in part by tax revenue, or which expend tax revenue, 6except the General Assembly and committees or commissions 7thereof. "Public body" includes tourism boards and convention 8or civic center boards located in counties that are contiguous 9to the Mississippi River with populations of more than 250,000 10but less than 300,000. "Public body" includes the Health 11Facilities and Services Review Board. "Public body" includes a 12nongovernmental organization that receives the lesser of 13$10,000 or 20% of its funding from the State. "Public body" 14does not include a child death review team or the Illinois 15Child Death Review Teams Executive Council established under 16the Child Death Review Team Act, an ethics commission acting 17under the State Officials and Employees Ethics Act, a regional 18youth advisory board or the Statewide Youth Advisory Board 19established under the Department of Children and Family 20Services Statewide Youth Advisory Board Act, the Illinois 21Independent Tax Tribunal, or the regional interagency fatality 22review teams and the Illinois Fatality Review Team Advisory 23Council established under the Adult Protective Services Act. 24(Source: P.A. 103-626, eff. 1-1-25.) 25    Section 10. The Freedom of Information Act is amended by   HB5613- 3 -LRB104 20772 BDA 34278 b1changing Section 2 as follows: 2    (5 ILCS 140/2)  (from Ch. 116, par. 202)3    Sec. 2. Definitions. As used in this Act:4    (a) "Public body" means all legislative, executive, 5administrative, or advisory bodies of the State, state 6universities and colleges, counties, townships, cities, 7villages, incorporated towns, school districts and all other 8municipal corporations, boards, bureaus, committees, or 9commissions of this State, any subsidiary bodies of any of the 10foregoing including but not limited to committees and 11subcommittees thereof, and a School Finance Authority created 12under Article 1E of the School Code. "Public body" includes a 13nongovernmental organization that receives the lesser of 14$10,000 or 20% of its funding from the State. "Public body" 15does not include a child death review team or the Illinois 16Child Death Review Teams Executive Council established under 17the Child Death Review Team Act, or a regional youth advisory 18board or the Statewide Youth Advisory Board established under 19the Department of Children and Family Services Statewide Youth 20Advisory Board Act.21    (b) "Person" means any individual or any individual acting 22as an agent of a corporation, partnership, firm, organization 23or association, acting individually or as a group.24    (c) "Public records" means all records, reports, forms, 25writings, letters, memoranda, books, papers, maps,   HB5613- 4 -LRB104 20772 BDA 34278 b1photographs, microfilms, cards, tapes, recordings, electronic 2data processing records, electronic communications, recorded 3information and all other documentary materials pertaining to 4the transaction of public business, regardless of physical 5form or characteristics, having been prepared by or for, or 6having been or being used by, received by, in the possession 7of, or under the control of any public body. "Public records" 8does not include junk mail. 9    (c-5) "Private information" means unique identifiers, 10including a person's social security number, driver's license 11number, employee identification number, biometric identifiers, 12personal financial information, passwords or other access 13codes, medical records, home or personal telephone numbers, 14and personal email addresses. Private information also 15includes home address and personal license plates, except as 16otherwise provided by law or when compiled without possibility 17of attribution to any person. For a public body that is a 18HIPAA-covered entity, "private information" includes 19electronic medical records and all information, including 20demographic information, contained within or extracted from an 21electronic medical records system operated or maintained by 22the public body in compliance with State and federal medical 23privacy laws and regulations, including, but not limited to, 24the Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act and 25its regulations, 45 CFR Parts 160 and 164. As used in this 26subsection, "HIPAA-covered entity" has the meaning given to   HB5613- 5 -LRB104 20772 BDA 34278 b1the term "covered entity" in 45 CFR 160.103.2    (c-10) "Commercial purpose" means the use of any part of a 3public record or records, or information derived from public 4records, in any form for sale, resale, or solicitation or 5advertisement for sales or services. For purposes of this 6definition, requests made by news media and non-profit, 7scientific, or academic organizations shall not be considered 8to be made for a "commercial purpose" when the principal 9purpose of the request is (i) to access and disseminate 10information concerning news and current or passing events, 11(ii) for articles of opinion or features of interest to the 12public, or (iii) for the purpose of academic, scientific, or 13public research or education.14    (d) "Copying" means the reproduction of any public record 15by means of any photographic, electronic, mechanical or other 16process, device or means now known or hereafter developed and 17available to the public body.18    (e) "Head of the public body" means the president, mayor, 19chairman, presiding officer, director, superintendent, 20manager, supervisor or individual otherwise holding primary 21executive and administrative authority for the public body, or 22such person's duly authorized designee.23    (f) "News media" means a newspaper or other periodical 24issued at regular intervals whether in print or electronic 25format, a news service whether in print or electronic format, 26a radio station, a television station, a television network, a   HB5613- 6 -LRB104 20772 BDA 34278 b1community antenna television service, or a person or 2corporation engaged in making news reels or other motion 3picture news for public showing.4    (g) "Recurrent requester", as used in Section 3.2 of this 5Act, means a person that, in the 12 months immediately 6preceding the request, has submitted to the same public body 7(i) a minimum of 50 requests for records, (ii) a minimum of 15 8requests for records within a 30-day period, or (iii) a 9minimum of 7 requests for records within a 7-day period. For 10purposes of this definition, requests made by news media and 11non-profit, scientific, or academic organizations shall not be 12considered in calculating the number of requests made in the 13time periods in this definition when the principal purpose of 14the requests is (i) to access and disseminate information 15concerning news and current or passing events, (ii) for 16articles of opinion or features of interest to the public, or 17(iii) for the purpose of academic, scientific, or public 18research or education.19    For the purposes of this subsection (g), "request" means a 20written document (or oral request, if the public body chooses 21to honor oral requests) that is submitted to a public body via 22personal delivery, mail, telefax, electronic mail, or other 23means available to the public body and that identifies the 24particular public record the requester seeks. One request may 25identify multiple records to be inspected or copied. 26    (h) "Voluminous request" means a request that: (i)   HB5613- 7 -LRB104 20772 BDA 34278 b1includes more than 5 individual requests for more than 5 2different categories of records or a combination of individual 3requests that total requests for more than 5 different 4categories of records in a period of 20 business days; or (ii) 5requires the compilation of more than 500 letter or 6legal-sized pages of public records unless a single requested 7record exceeds 500 pages. "Single requested record" may 8include, but is not limited to, one report, form, e-mail, 9letter, memorandum, book, map, microfilm, tape, or recording.10    "Voluminous request" does not include a request made by 11news media and non-profit, scientific, or academic 12organizations if the principal purpose of the request is: (1) 13to access and disseminate information concerning news and 14current or passing events; (2) for articles of opinion or 15features of interest to the public; or (3) for the purpose of 16academic, scientific, or public research or education.17    For the purposes of this subsection (h), "request" means a 18written document, or oral request, if the public body chooses 19to honor oral requests, that is submitted to a public body via 20personal delivery, mail, telefax, electronic mail, or other 21means available to the public body and that identifies the 22particular public record or records the requester seeks. One 23request may identify multiple individual records to be 24inspected or copied. 25    (i) "Severance agreement" means a mutual agreement between 26any public body and its employee for the employee's   HB5613- 8 -LRB104 20772 BDA 34278 b1resignation in exchange for payment by the public body. 2    (j) "Junk mail" means (i) any unsolicited commercial mail 3sent to a public body and not responded to by an official, 4employee, or agent of the public body or (ii) any unsolicited 5commercial electronic communication sent to a public body and 6not responded to by an official, employee, or agent of the 7public body. 8(Source: P.A. 103-554, eff. 1-1-24; 104-438, eff. 1-1-26.)